District of Columbia statutes.
38-1208.03

Repealed

Establishment of Advisory Board.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VIII, § 803
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2202, 49 DCR 6968
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 263(b), 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 38-1208.01.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 263(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 263(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).